en: Hairy crabgrass, Large crabgrass
de: Bluthirse, Blutrote Fingerhirse
es: Guarda rocío
fr: Digitaire sanguine, Millet sanguin, Manne rouge d'Europe
hr: Dlakava crabgrass
la: Digitaria sanguinalis
nl: Bloedgierst

en: Flax seeds, Flax, Linseeds, Common flax
bg: Ленено семе
de: Leinsamen, Leinsaaten, Leinsaat
es: Lino, Linaza, Semillas de lino
fi: pellavansiemenet
fr: Lins, Lin cultivé, Graines de lin
hr: Sjemenke lana
it: Lino, Semi di lino
la: Linum usitatissimum
lt: Linų sėmenys
nl: Lijnzaad, Zaad van vlas
pl: Siemię lniane, Nasiona lnu
pt: Linhaça

en: Gold flax seeds, Gold flax, Gold linseeds
bg: Златно ленено семе
de: Goldleinsamen
es: Lino dorado, Linaza dorada, Semillas de lino dorado
fr: Graine de lin doré, Graines de lin dorées
hr: Zlatne sjemenke lana
nl: Geel lijnzaad
pl: Siemię lniane złote
pt: Linhaça dourada, sementes de linhaça dourada

en: Brown flax seeds, Brown flax, Brown linseeds
bg: Кафяво ленено семе
de: braune Leinsamen, braune Leinsaaten, braune Leinsaat
es: Lino marrón, Linaza marrón, Semillas de lino marrón
fr: Graines de lin brun, Graines de lin brunes
hr: Sjemenke smeđeg lana
nl: Bruin lijnzaad
pl: Siemię lniane brązowe
pt: Linhaça marrom, sementes de linhaça marrom

en: Ground flax seeds
de: geschrotete Leinsamen, geschrotete Leinsaaten, geschrotete Leinsaat
es: Lino molido
hr: Mljevene sjemenke lana
nl: Gemalen lijnzaad

en: Ground gold flax seeds
de: geschrotete Goldleinsamen, geschrotete Goldleinsaaten, geschrotete Goldleinsaat
es: Lino dorado molido
hr: Mljevene sjemenke zlatnog lana
nl: Gemalen geel lijnzaad

en: Ground brown flax seeds
de: geschrotete braune Leinsamen, geschrotete braune Leinsaaten, geschrotete braune Leinsaat
es: Lino marrón molido
hr: Mljevene sjemenke smeđeg lana
nl: Gemalen bruin lijnzaad

en: Hemp seeds
fr: Graines de chanvre

en: Freekeh
fr: Freekeh

en: Meslin, Maslin
es: Morcajo, Tranquillón, Mezclas de trigo y centeno
fr: Méteil, Mélange de blé et seigle
hr: Meslin
nl: Masteluin

en: Millet
de: Hirse
es: Mijo
fr: Millet
hr: Proso
it: Miglio
nl: Gierst (divers)

en: Whole millet
fr: Mil entier
hr: Punomasni proso
nl: Gierst (volkoren), Volkoren griest

en: Pearl millet
de: Perlhirse
es: Mijo perla
fr: Mil, Mil à chandelle
hr: Biserno proso
la: Pennisetum glaucum
nl: Parelgierst

en: Proso millet, Common millet, White millet
de: Rispenhirse
es: Mijo común
fr: Millet commun
hr: Proso proso
la: Panicum miliaceum
nl: Gierst

en: Unsalted cooked millet
fr: Mil cuit non salé

en: Quinoa
bg: Киноа
de: Quinoa
es: Quinoa
fi: kvinoa
fr: Quinoa
hr: Kvinoja
hu: Quinoa
it: Quinoa
ja: キヌア
la: Chenopodium quinoa
nl: Quinoa, Gierstmelde
zh: 藜麦

en: Unsalted boiled quinoa, Unsalted quinoa cooked in water
fr: Quinoa bouilli non salé, Quinoa cuit à l'eau non salé

en: Red quinoa
bg: Червена киноа
de: Rotes Quinoa
es: Quinoa roja
fr: Quinoa rouge
hr: Crvena kvinoja
nl: Rode quinoa

en: Raw quinoa from France, Quinoa from France (raw)
fr: Quinoa de France cru
hr: Quinoa fr sirova
nl: Quinoa uit Frankrijk (ongekookt)

en: Quinoa FR boiled/cooked in water unsalted
fr: Quinoa FR cuit
hr: Kvinoja fr kuhana/kuhana u vodi neslanoj
nl: Quinoa uit Frankrijk (gekookt)